Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Personnel Administration System

§ 25-9-101.
Purpose of chapter.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish in the State of Mississippi a system of personnel administration based on sound methods of personnel administration governing the establishment of employment positions, classification of positions and the employment conduct, movement and separation of state employees; to build a career service in government which will attract, select and retain the best persons, with incentives in the form of equal opportunities for initial appointment and promotions in the state service; to establish a system of personnel management that will ensure the effective and efficient use of employees in the state service; and to perform such other duties as may be specified in this chapter or any other law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 329, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 25-9-103.
Principles applicable to administration of state personnel system.

The State Personnel Board herein established shall administer a state personnel system in accordance with the following principles:

To recruit, select and advance employees on the basis of their relative ability, knowledge and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for initial appointment;

To provide equitable and adequate compensation;

To train employees, as needed, to assure high quality performance;

To retain employees on the basis of the adequacy of their performance, to correct inadequate performance, and to separate employees whose inadequate performance cannot be corrected;

To assure fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of personnel administration without regard to political affiliation, race, national origin, sex, religious creed, age or disability;

To assure that employees are free from coercion for partisan or political purposes and to prohibit employees from using their official authority for the purpose of interfering with or affecting the result of an election or a nomination for office;

To provide authority for the establishment and abolishment of employment positions within the departments, agencies and institutions covered under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 2(1); Laws, 1998, ch. 321, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 25-9-105.
Consolidation of agencies and employees into state personnel system.

It is the intent of this chapter to consolidate into one (1) state personnel system all agencies and employees now administered by the Mississippi Classification Commission, agencies and employees now administered by the Mississippi Coordinated Merit System Council, and such other agencies and employees except as excluded by this chapter. The State Personnel Board established herein shall assume the total functions of personnel administration services (a) for those agencies and positions now required and operating under merit system rules due to federal statutory and regulatory provisions or state law, and (b) for all state agencies, departments and institutions except as excluded by this chapter. However, state agencies which are not required by law to operate under merit system rules may request an exemption from the applicant selection process by specific job class or on an agency-wide basis when such exemption is justifiable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 2(2); Laws, 2014, ch. 491, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 2014).

§ 25-9-107.
Definitions.

The following terms, when used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:

“Board” means the State Personnel Board created under the provisions of this chapter.

“State service” means all employees of state departments, agencies and institutions as defined herein, except those officers and employees excluded by this chapter.

“Nonstate service” means the following officers and employees excluded from the state service by this chapter. The following are excluded from the state service:

Members of the State Legislature, their staff and other employees of the legislative branch;

The Governor and staff members of the immediate Office of the Governor;

Justices and judges of the judicial branch or members of appeals boards on a per diem basis;

The Lieutenant Governor, staff members of the immediate Office of the Lieutenant Governor and officers and employees directly appointed by the Lieutenant Governor;

Officers and officials elected by popular vote and persons appointed to fill vacancies in elective offices;

Members of boards and commissioners appointed by the Governor, Lieutenant Governor or the State Legislature;

All academic officials, members of the teaching staffs and employees of the state institutions of higher learning, the Mississippi Community College Board, and community and junior colleges;

Officers and enlisted members of the National Guard of the state;

Prisoners, inmates, student or patient help working in or about institutions;

Contract personnel; provided that any agency which employs state service employees may enter into contracts for personal and professional services only if such contracts are approved in compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the State Personal Service Contract Review Board under Section 25-9-120(3). Before paying any warrant for such contractual services in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), the Auditor of Public Accounts, or the successor to those duties, shall determine whether the contract involved was for personal or professional services, and, if so, was approved by the State Personal Service Contract Review Board;

Part-time employees; provided, however, part-time employees shall only be hired into authorized employment positions classified by the board, shall meet minimum qualifications as set by the board, and shall be paid in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan as certified by the board;

Persons appointed on an emergency basis for the duration of the emergency; the effective date of the emergency appointments shall not be earlier than the date approved by the State Personnel Director, and shall be limited to thirty (30) working days. Emergency appointments may be extended to sixty (60) working days by the State Personnel Board;

Physicians, dentists, veterinarians, nurse practitioners and attorneys, while serving in their professional capacities in authorized employment positions who are required by statute to be licensed, registered or otherwise certified as such, provided that the State Personnel Director shall verify that the statutory qualifications are met prior to issuance of a payroll warrant by the Auditor;

Personnel who are employed and paid from funds received from a federal grant program which has been approved by the Legislature or the Department of Finance and Administration whose length of employment has been determined to be time-limited in nature. This subparagraph shall apply to personnel employed under the provisions of the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act of 1973, as amended, and other special federal grant programs which are not a part of regular federally funded programs wherein appropriations and employment positions are appropriated by the Legislature. Such employees shall be paid in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan and shall meet all qualifications required by federal statutes or by the Mississippi Classification Plan;

The administrative head who is in charge of any state department, agency, institution, board or commission, wherein the statute specifically authorizes the Governor, board, commission or other authority to appoint said administrative head; provided, however, that the salary of such administrative head shall be determined by the State Personnel Board in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan unless otherwise fixed by statute;

The State Personnel Board shall exclude top-level positions if the incumbents determine and publicly advocate substantive program policy and report directly to the agency head, or the incumbents are required to maintain a direct confidential working relationship with a key excluded official. Provided further, a written job classification shall be approved by the board for each such position, and positions so excluded shall be paid in conformity with the Variable Compensation Plan;

Employees whose employment is solely in connection with an agency’s contract to produce, store or transport goods, and whose compensation is derived therefrom;

Repealed;

The associate director, deputy directors and bureau directors within the Department of Agriculture and Commerce;

Personnel employed by the Mississippi Industries for the Blind; provided that any agency may enter into contracts for the personal services of MIB employees without the prior approval of the State Personnel Board or the State Personal Service Contract Review Board; however, any agency contracting for the personal services of an MIB employee shall provide the MIB employee with not less than the entry-level compensation and benefits that the agency would provide to a full-time employee of the agency who performs the same services;

Personnel employed by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources as law enforcement trainees (cadets); such personnel shall be paid in accordance with the Colonel Guy Groff State Variable Compensation Plan;

Administrators and instructional employees under contract or employed by the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA) established in Section 37-140-1 et seq.;

The President of the Mississippi Lottery Corporation and personnel employed by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation.

“Agency” means any state board, commission, committee, council, department or unit thereof created by the Constitution or statutes if such board, commission, committee, council, department, unit or the head thereof, is authorized to appoint subordinate staff by the Constitution or statute, except a legislative or judicial board, commission, committee, council, department or unit thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 171; Laws, 1990, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 18; Laws, 1996, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 609, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 574, § 5; Laws, 2003, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 363, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 397, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 48, eff from and after September 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 432, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 25-9-109.
State Personnel Board members, terms of office, qualifications, vacancies.

There is hereby created a board of five (5) members to be known as the State Personnel Board to be appointed by the Governor as hereinafter provided, with the advice and consent of the Senate.

Gubernatorial appointees serving on the board on June 30, 1984, shall continue to serve on the board, and the terms of such members shall be extended as follows:

The term of the member serving from the Third Supreme Court District shall expire on June 30, 1986.

The term of the member serving from the state at large shall expire on June 30, 1987.

The term of the member serving from the First Supreme Court District shall expire on June 30, 1988.

The term of the member serving from the Second Supreme Court District shall expire on June 30, 1989.

For a term to begin on July 1, 1984, the Governor shall appoint one (1) member from the state at large for a term of one (1) year.

Upon the expiration of the foregoing terms, such appointments shall be made by the Governor from the appropriate geographical area for terms of five (5) years beginning July 1 of the year of appointment.

An appointment to fill a vacancy, other than by expiration of a term of office, shall be made by the Governor for the balance of the unexpired term.

All appointees shall have at least a bachelor’s degree in public administration, personnel management or in a management-related field of study or, in the alternative, shall have a bachelor’s degree in any field and ten (10) years of experience in a position the duties of which specifically required the appointee to carry out personnel management responsibilities in an organization and were the exclusive responsibilities of his position. An appointee with a graduate degree in public administration, personnel management or in a management-related field of study shall also be qualified to serve on the board. In the alternative, an appointee with a graduate degree in any field shall be qualified if he has five (5) years of experience in a position the duties of which specifically required him to carry out personnel management responsibilities in an organization and were the exclusive responsibilities of his position.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 4(1); Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 304; Laws, 2005, ch. 411, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2005.).

§ 25-9-111.
Officers of board, regulations as to meetings.

There shall be a chairman and vice chairman of the board, elected by and from the membership of the board. The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings, and governing the manner of conducting its business. Any member who shall not attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings of the board shall be subject to removal by a majority vote of the board members.

The Lieutenant Governor may designate two (2) senators and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate two (2) representatives to attend any meeting of the State Personnel Board. The appointing authorities may designate alternate members from their respective houses to serve when the regular designees are unable to attend such meetings of the board. Such legislative designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the board. For attending meetings of the board, such legislators shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the board will be paid while the Legislature is in session. No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the board without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 4(2)(3); Laws, 1984, ch. 488, §§ 305 and 306, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 25-9-113.
Regular meetings; compensation and expenses of members.

The State Personnel Board shall prescribe the general policies by which the state personnel system shall be administered. The board shall hold regular meetings at least once each month and may hold additional meetings as may be required for the proper discharge of its duties. Members of the board shall receive a per diem as is authorized by law for each day spent in actual discharge of their duties and shall be reimbursed for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with requirements of Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. No board member may incur per diem, travel or other expenses unless previously authorized by vote at a meeting of the board, which action shall be recorded in the official minutes of said meetings. All expenses of the board incurred in the administration of this chapter shall be paid from such funds as may be appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 5(1); Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1980).

§ 25-9-115.
State Personnel Board to report to Legislature recommendations for judicial salaries; factors to be considered.

From and after November 1, 2017, and every four (4) years thereafter, the State Personnel Board shall prepare a written report to the Legislature that examines, evaluates and recommends an adequate level of compensation for the justices of the Supreme Court, the judges of the Court of Appeals, the judges of the chancery and circuit courts, the judges of the county courts, judicial staff attorneys, and law clerks. In preparing the report, the board shall consider all appropriate factors including, but not limited to, comparative judicial, judicial staff attorney, and law clerk salaries in neighboring states and in the Southeast as a whole; comparative judicial, judicial staff attorney, and law clerk salaries in the federal judiciary; salaries of comparable professionals in government, academia, private law practice and the corporate sector; changes in public sector spending; rates of inflation; and the overall economic climate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 329, § 6, effective July 1, 2012.

§ 25-9-116.
Suspension of hiring, promotion and other reclassifications.

Upon recommendation of the State Fiscal Management Board, after a determination that the state revenue and expenditure requires such action the State Personnel Board may institute an immediate suspension of all hirings, promotions, reclassifications, reallocations and pay grade realignments until such time as the state fiscal management board shall recommend that such action is no longer required.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 14; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 172, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 25-9-117.
Mississippi Personnel Advisory Council; membership; duties; expenses.

There is hereby created and established the Mississippi Personnel Advisory Council, which shall consist of the personnel directors of five (5) major state agencies to be appointed by the Governor. Members of the council shall serve for a term concurrent with that of the Governor.

It is made the duty of the Mississippi Personnel Advisory Council and it is hereby granted the authority to:

Advise the State Personnel Board in the development of comprehensive policies and programs for the improvement of public employment in the state;

Assist in the formulation of rules, regulations and standards relating to the state personnel system; and

Assist in the promotion of public understanding of the purposes, policies and practices of the state personnel system.

Members of the council shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, including food, lodging and mileage as authorized by Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, required for attendance at council meetings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved February 8, 1980).

§ 25-9-119.
State personnel director; selection; qualifications; duties; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

There is created the position of the State Personnel Director who shall be selected by the State Personnel Board, with the advice and consent of the Senate. The director shall have at least a Juris Doctor degree from an accredited law school or a master’s degree in business administration, personnel management or the equivalent and shall have not less than five (5) years’ experience therein. His salary shall be in accordance with the Mississippi Compensation Plan. The State Personnel Director shall serve at the will and pleasure of the State Personnel Board.

The duties and responsibilities of the director shall be:

To serve as executive secretary to the board, to attend meetings as directed by the board and to provide such professional, technical and other supportive assistance as may be required by the board in the performance of its duties;

Consistent with board policy, to administer the operations of the State Personnel System and to otherwise act in the capacity of Chief Executive Officer to the State Personnel Board;

To submit for board approval proposed rules and regulations which shall require a uniform system of personnel administration within all agencies included in this chapter. Such rules and regulations, when approved by the board, shall be binding upon the state departments, agencies and institutions covered by this chapter and shall include provisions for the establishment and maintenance of classification and compensation plans, the conduct of examinations, employee recruiting, employee selection, the certification of eligible persons, appointments, promotions, transfers, demotions, separations, reinstatement, appeals, reports of performance, payroll certification, employee training, vacation and sick leave, compensatory leave, administrative leave, standardized recordkeeping forms and procedures for leave earned, accrued and used, and all other phases of personnel administration. Such rules and regulations shall not be applicable to the emergency hiring of employees by the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to Section 25-11-15(7). Copies of the rules and regulations, or modifications thereto, as are approved by the State Personnel Board, shall be provided to the Chairmen of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committee of the Senate and the Fees and Salaries of Public Officers Committee of the House of Representatives, the Lieutenant Governor and the Governor at least sixty (60) days before their effective date. The respective parties may submit comments to the board regarding such rules and regulations before their effective date;

Compensation plans and modifications thereto promulgated under rules and regulations shall become effective as adopted, upon appropriation therefor by the State Legislature;

The director and the board shall provide for:

1. Cost-of-living adjustments;

2. Salary increases for outstanding performance based upon documented employee productivity and exceptional performance in assigned duties; and

3. Plans to compensate employees for suggestions which result in improved management in technical or administrative procedures and result in documented cost savings for the state. In certifying promotions, the director shall ensure that an employee’s anniversary date remains the same regardless of the date of his promotion;

To submit to the board any proposed legislation as may be necessary to bring existing statutes relating to the administration of public employees into uniformity;

To administer the rules and regulations and all other operational aspects of the State Personnel System and to assure compliance therewith in all the departments, agencies and institutions covered by the State Personnel System;

To appoint and prescribe the duties of the State Personnel System staff, all positions of which shall be included in the state service;

To prepare an annual budget for the board covering all the costs of operating the State Personnel System, including the State Personnel Board, and the costs of administering such federal laws relating to personnel administration as the board may direct, including the Intergovernmental Personnel Act of 1970;

To assist state agencies, departments and institutions in complying with all applicable state and federal statutes and regulations concerning discrimination in employment, personnel administration and related matters;

To recommend procedures for the establishment and abolishment of employment positions within those departments, agencies and institutions not excluded from this chapter; and

To cooperate with appointing authorities in the administration of this chapter in order to promote public service and establish conditions of service which will attract and retain employees of character and capacity and to increase efficiency and economy in governmental departments by the improvement of methods of personnel administration with full recognition of the requirements and needs of management.

From and after July 1, 2016, the State Personnel Board shall not charge another state agency a fee, assessment, or other charge for services or resources received by that agency from the State Personnel Board.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 7; Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 8; Laws, 1989, ch. 533, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 11; Laws, 1999, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 387, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 69, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-9-120.
Contract personnel not state service or nonstate service employees of state; Personal Service Contract Review Board abolished; Public Procurement Review Board to be the Personal Service Contract Review Board.

Contract personnel, whether classified as contract workers or independent contractors shall not be deemed state service or nonstate service employees of the State of Mississippi, and shall not be eligible to participate in the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or the State and School Employees’ Health Insurance Plan, nor be allowed credit for personal and sick leave and other leave benefits as employees of the State of Mississippi, notwithstanding Sections 25-3-91 through 25-3-101; 25-9-101 through 25-9-151; 25-11-1 through 25-11-126; 25-11-128 through 25-11-131; 25-15-1 through 25-15-23 and for the purpose set forth herein. Contract workers, i.e., contract personnel who do not meet the criteria of independent contractors, shall be subject to the provisions of Section 25-11-127.

The Personal Service Contract Review Board is abolished. The Public Procurement Review Board shall be the Personal Service Contract Review Board and shall retain all powers and duties granted by law to the Personal Service Contract Review Board. All equipment, inventories, records, personnel, resources and other property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, of the Personal Service Contract Review Board shall be transferred to the Public Procurement Review Board as provided in Section 27-104-7. The transfer of personnel shall be commensurate with the number and classification of positions (PINS) allocated to the Personal Service Contract Review Board on June 30, 2017. Wherever the terms “Personal Service Contract Review Board” or “board,” when referring to the Personal Service Contract Review Board, appear in any law, rule, regulation or document the same shall be construed to mean the Public Procurement Review Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 401, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 609, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 421, § 5; Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 494, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 309, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 14, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 25-9-121.
State service; status of permanent or certified employees under prior systems.

The state service, as defined by Section 25-9-107, shall consist of all positions now existing in the state departments, agencies and institutions or hereafter established, except those included in the nonstate service by this chapter. Such positions shall be covered by the state personnel system. Any officer or employee who has acquired a valid permanent status under the Mississippi Coordinated Merit System Council existing on February 1, 1981, shall continue in such status and shall not be required to take further or new examinations in order to retain such status. Any officer or employee who has been certified by the Mississippi Classification Commission and appointed by a state agency head as of February 1, 1981, shall continue in such status and shall not be required to take further or new examinations in order to retain such status.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 8(1), eff from and after February 1, 1981.

§ 25-9-123.
Nonstate service; exclusion of positions covered by prior systems.

The nonstate service, as defined by Section 25-9-107, shall consist of all positions in the departments, agencies and institutions of state government not included in the state service under this chapter and shall not be subject to the rules and regulations of the state personnel system. No position existing on February 1, 1981, which is covered by the Mississippi Coordinated Merit System Council shall be excluded from the state service, unless such position is specifically excluded by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 8(2), eff from and after February 1, 1981.

§ 25-9-125.
Temporary assignment of state service employees to nonstate service.

A state service employee, with the consent of the head of the department, agency or institution and the concurrence of the state personnel director, may be placed on a leave of absence for purposes of accepting an assignment in the nonstate service for a period not to exceed one (1) year, subject to rules adopted by the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 8(3), eff from and after February 1, 1981.

§ 25-9-126.
Furlough of federally funded employees.

In the event that federal funds for the funding of programs of any state agency shall be restricted or limited, the administrative board of such agency or agency administrative head shall have the authority to furlough rather than dismiss employees in accordance with rules and regulations established by the State Personnel Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 600, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 25-9-127.
Prerequisites to dismissal or action adversely affecting compensation or employment status; exceptions; exemption of personnel actions of certain state agencies from State Personnel Board procedures for limited time period; operating state vehicle without license good cause grounds for dismissal; male state employees required to register with selective service.

No employee of any department, agency or institution who is included under this chapter or hereafter included under its authority, and who is subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the state personnel system, may be dismissed or otherwise adversely affected as to compensation or employment status except for inefficiency or other good cause, and after written notice and hearing within the department, agency or institution as shall be specified in the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board complying with due process of law; and any employee who has by written notice of dismissal or action adversely affecting his compensation or employment status shall, on hearing and on any appeal of any decision made in such action, be required to furnish evidence that the reasons stated in the notice of dismissal or action adversely affecting his compensation or employment status are not true or are not sufficient grounds for the action taken; provided, however, that this provision shall not apply (a) to persons separated from any department, agency or institution due to curtailment of funds or reduction in staff when such separation is in accordance with rules and regulations of the state personnel system; (b) during the probationary period of state service of twelve (12) months; and (c) to an executive officer of any state agency who serves at the will and pleasure of the Governor, board, commission or other appointing authority.

The operation of a state-owned motor vehicle without a valid Mississippi driver’s license by an employee of any department, agency or institution that is included under this chapter and that is subject to the rules and regulations of the state personnel system shall constitute good cause for dismissal of such person from employment.

Beginning July 1, 1999, every male between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-six (26) who is required to register under the federal Military Selective Service Act, 50 USCS App. 453, and who is an employee of the state shall not be promoted to any higher position of employment with the state until he submits to the person, commission, board or agency by which he is employed satisfactory documentation of his compliance with the draft registration requirements of the Military Selective Service Act. The documentation shall include a signed affirmation under penalty of perjury that the male employee has complied with the requirements of the Military Selective Service Act.

For a period of two (2) years beginning July 1, 2014, the provisions of subsection (1) shall not apply to the personnel actions of the State Department of Education that are subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, and all employees of the department shall be classified as nonstate service during that period. However, any employee hired after July 1, 2014, by the department shall meet the criteria of the State Personnel Board as it presently exists for employment. The State Superintendent of Public Education and the State Board of Education shall consult with the Office of the Attorney General before taking personnel actions authorized by this section to review those actions for compliance with applicable state and federal law.

It is not the intention or effect of this section to include any school attendance officer in any exemption from coverage under the State Personnel Board policy or regulations, including, but not limited to, termination and conditions of employment.

For a period of two (2) years beginning July 1, 2015, the provisions of subsection (1) shall not apply to the personnel actions of the Department of Corrections, and all employees of the department shall be classified as nonstate service during that period. However, any employee hired after July 1, 2015, by the department shall meet the criteria of the State Personnel Board as it presently exists for employment.

Additionally, for a period of one (1) year beginning July 1, 2016, the personnel actions of the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall be exempt from State Personnel Board rules, regulations and procedures in order to give the commissioner flexibility in making an orderly, effective and timely reorganization and realignment of the department.

The Commissioner of Corrections shall consult with the Office of the Attorney General before personnel actions authorized by this section to review those actions for compliance with applicable state and federal law.

Through July 1, 2020, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the personnel actions of the Department of Human Services that are subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, and all employees of the department shall be classified as nonstate service during that period. Any employee hired on or after July 1, 2020, by the department shall meet the criteria of the State Personnel Board as it presently exists for employment. The Executive Director of Human Services shall consult with the Office of the Attorney General before taking personnel actions authorized by this section to review those actions for compliance with applicable state and federal law.

Through July 1, 2020, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the personnel actions of the Department of Child Protection Services that are subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, and all employees of the department shall be classified as nonstate service during that period. Any employee hired on or after July 1, 2020, by the division shall meet the criteria of the State Personnel Board as it presently exists for employment. The Commissioner of Child Protection Services shall consult with the Office of the Attorney General before taking personnel actions authorized by this section to review those actions for compliance with applicable state and federal law.

Any state agency whose personnel actions are exempted in this section from the rules, regulations and procedures of the State Personnel Board shall file with the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the members of the Senate and House Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees an annual report no later than July 1, 2016, and each year thereafter while under the exemption. Such annual report shall contain the following information:

The number of current employees who received an increase in salary during the past fiscal year and the amount of the increase;

The number of employees who were dismissed from the agency or otherwise adversely affected as to compensation or employment status during the past fiscal year, including a description of such adverse effects; and

The number of new employees hired during the past fiscal year and the starting salaries of each new employee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 9(1); Laws, 1994, ch. 523, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 411, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 494, § 5; Laws, 2016, ch. 495, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 382, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 25-9-129.
Employee appeals board; membership; terms of office; compensation.

The State Personnel Board shall appoint an employee appeals board, which shall consist of three (3) hearing officers, for the purpose of holding hearings, compiling evidence and rendering decisions on appeals of state agency action adversely affecting the employment status or compensation of any employee in the state service. Hearings before the employee appeals board may be conducted by an individual hearing officer or by the board en banc, as provided in State Personnel Board rules. The original appointments shall be effective February 1, 1981, as follows:

One (1) hearing officer from the first Supreme Court district, for a term of two (2) years to expire February 1, 1983;

One (1) hearing officer from the second Supreme Court district, for a term of three (3) years to expire February 1, 1984; and

One (1) hearing officer from the third Supreme Court district for a term of four (4) years to expire February 1, 1985.

Upon expiration of the foregoing terms, members shall be appointed by the board for terms to expire February 1 each four (4) years thereafter, and may be reappointed. The members of the employee appeals board shall be paid an appropriate fee, to be established by the attorney general, and they shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary expenses incurred while hearing an appeal as authorized by general law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 9(2); Laws, 1982, ch. 390, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1982.